Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 18 Public Corporation Debt Management

35-18-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Public Corporation Debt Management Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 148, § 1.

35-18-2.
Definitions.

The words defined in this section shall have the meanings set forth below whenever they appear in this chapter, unless the context in which they are used clearly requires a different meaning:

“Bond” and “obligation” mean an agreement by any person to repay borrowed money.

“Economic development project” means any project which the Rhode Island industrial facilities corporation is authorized to undertake, including, without limitation, a project related to financing the acquisition of any land and any building or other improvement which shall be suitable for manufacturing, warehousing, or other industrial or commercial purposes, including research, production, processing, agricultural, and marine commerce; provided, however, that the project may include, in addition, the construction or improvement of access roads and utilities, but only access roads and utilities, and only those which are necessary for the operation of that project.

“Essential public facilities” means roads, bridges, airports, prisons, reservoirs, waste and wastewater treatment facilities, educational facilities, and any other facilities used by any state agency, department, board, or commission, including the board of governors for higher education, to provide services to the public pursuant to the requirements of state or federal law, all fixtures for any of those facilities and facilities financed or refinanced by bonds or other obligations of the water resources board corporate. It does not include any personal property.

“Financing lease” means an agreement in the form of a lease between the state and any person which provides that upon payment by the state as lessee of aggregate rent equal to no less than all of the principal and interest on bonds or other obligations issued by the lessor to finance the acquisition, construction, or improvement of all or any part of an essential public facility, the state shall have the right to possess, use and enjoy that facility pursuant to the lease for a specified period and the option to purchase that facility for a nominal sum at the end of the period.

“Governor” means the governor of the state.

“Guarantee” and “guarantee lease” mean an agreement on the part of the state to guarantee any liability of a public corporation except a liability of the Rhode Island industrial recreational building authority.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, public corporation, trust, or association.

“Public corporation” means any body corporate and politic created or to be created pursuant to statute, including, without limitation, the Rhode Island industrial recreational building authority, the Rhode Island economic development corporation and any subsidiaries thereof, the Rhode Island industrial facilities corporation, the Rhode Island refunding bond authority, the Rhode Island health and educational building authority, the board of governors for higher education, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, the Rhode Island public transit authority, the Rhode Island student loan authority, the water resources board corporate, (except as provided below), the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, the Rhode Island depositors economic protection corporation, the Rhode Island convention center authority, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, their successors and assigns. Cities, towns, and any corporation created by a city or town pursuant to statute, and fire and water districts, are not public corporations under this chapter. The water resources board corporate is not a public corporation under this chapter to the extent it is financing or refinancing bonds or other obligations on behalf of a city, town, city or town instrumentalities or agencies, or fire or water districts.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island, and any department, office, board, commission, or agency of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 318, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 25.

35-18-3.
Approval by the general assembly.

No elected or appointed state official may enter into any financing lease or into any guarantee with any person without the prior approval of the general assembly unless:

The governor certifies that federal funds will be available to make all of the payments which the state is or could be obligated to make under the financing lease or guarantee; or

The general assembly has adjourned for the year with the expectation that it will not meet again until the following year and the governor certifies that action is necessary, because of events occurring after the general assembly has adjourned, to protect the physical integrity of an essential public facility, to ensure the continued delivery of essential public services, or to maintain the credit worthiness of the state in the financial markets.

No bonds may be issued or other obligation incurred by any public corporation to finance, in whole or in part, the construction, acquisition, or improvement of any essential public facility without the prior approval of the general assembly, unless:

The governor certifies that federal funds will be available to make all of the payments required to be made by the public corporation in connection with the bond or obligation. The certification shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors; or

The general assembly has adjourned for the year with the expectation that it will not meet again until the following year and the governor certifies that action is necessary, because of events occurring after the general assembly has adjourned, to protect the physical integrity of an essential public facility, to ensure the continued delivery of essential public services, or to maintain the credit worthiness of the state in the financial markets. The certification shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate, with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors.

In addition to, and not by way of limitation on, the exemptions provided in subsections (a) and (b), prior approval by the general assembly shall not be required under this chapter for bonds or other obligations issued by, or financing leases or guarantee agreements entered into by:

The Rhode Island Industrial Facilities Corporation; provided financing leases, bonds or other obligations are being issued for an economic development project;

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank;

The Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation;

The Rhode Island student loan authority;

Any public corporation to refund any bond or other obligation issued by the public corporation to finance the acquisition, construction, or improvement of an essential public facility provided that the governor certifies to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate, with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors that the refunding shall provide a net benefit to the issuer; provided, however, obligations of the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation outstanding on July 31, 1999, may be refunded by the issuance of obligations on or before August 1, 1999;

The Narragansett Bay commission;

The Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, except bonds or other obligations issued in connection with the acquisition, construction, or improvement of any facility used by any state agency, department, board, or commission, including the council on postsecondary education, to provide services to the public pursuant to the requirements of state or federal law, and all fixtures for any of those facilities; and

The state to refund any financing leases entered into with the authorization of the general assembly, provided that the governor certifies to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate, with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors, that the refunding shall provide a net benefit to the state.

Nothing contained in this section applies to any loan authorized to be borrowed under Article VI, § 16 or 17 of the Rhode Island Constitution.

Nothing in this section is intended to expand in any way the borrowing authority of any public corporation under its charter.

Any certification made by the governor under subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section may be relied upon by any person, including without limitation, bond counsel.

The certifications shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors.

Except as provided for in this chapter, the requirements of this chapter supersede any other special or general provision of law, including any provision which purports to exempt sales or leases between the state and a public corporation from the operation of any law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 464, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 75; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 17, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 25; P.L. 2013, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 4.

35-18-4.
Procedure.

A financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation shall be deemed to have been approved by the general assembly when the general assembly passes a concurrent resolution of approval regarding the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation which the governor or a public corporation, as the case may be, requests that the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation be approved by the general assembly. These requests shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors. The request for approval shall include:

A full description of the essential public facility to which the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation is related;

An explanation as to why the facility is needed and how it will be paid off; and

The maximum possible obligation of the state or of any public corporation under the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation.

The governor shall provide the general assembly with a timely explanation of any certification made by him or her pursuant to this chapter in connection with any financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation. These explanations shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors. The explanation shall also include:

A full description of the essential public facility to which the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation is related;

An explanation as to why the facility is needed and how it will be paid off; and

The maximum possible obligation of the state or of any public corporation under the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation.

The state shall not enter into any financing lease or guarantee relating to, nor shall any public corporation issue any bond or other obligation in connection with, any essential public facility unless the facility conforms to the description included in the request for approval or in the explanation for certification submitted by the governor in connection with the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation; nor shall the state’s obligation in connection with the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation exceed the amount set forth in the request for approval or explanation of certification.

Immediately following the first sale of each issue of bonds in connection with the financing of an economic development project, the governor shall provide the general assembly with copies of any offering statement for those bonds and his or her analysis of the benefits and risks to the state of the project. These statements and analyses shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate, with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance committees and fiscal advisors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 75; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 6, § 1.

35-18-5.
Existing obligations.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to interfere with the obligations of the state or any public corporation under any trust agreement, financing lease, or other agreement in effect on, or with respect to any bonds or other obligations outstanding on, January 1, 1995.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 148, § 1.